Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2304.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; highway projects; fiscal year 2026-2027 The following amounts are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation for the following projects: 1. Distribution to the city of Bullhead City for Baseline Road reconstruction project       $ 1,543,700 2. Distribution to the city of Bullhead City for State Route 95 right-hand turn lane        $ 9,000,000 3. Distribution to the town of Kearny for Senator Chastain Road improvements             $ 1,000,000 4. Distribution to the town of Star Valley for town street improvements and town park parking lot paving                        $ 2,615,800 5. Distribution to the city of Globe for Pinal Creek bridge replacement                 $ 4,000,000 6. Distribution to the city of Globe for Yuma Street bridge replacement                 $ 3,500,000 7. Distribution to the town of Miami for town street and bridge improvements            $ 2,800,000 8. Distribution to Pinal county for Calle Futura and Neal Street paving and improvements                                   $ 1,084,400 9. Distribution to Pinal county for McNab Parkway paving and improvements                $ 2,590,000 10. Distribution to the town of Superior for Panther Drive improvements                     $ 1,674,600 11. Distribution to the town of Superior for Sunset Drive improvements                      $ 1,636,000 12. Distribution to the town of Winkelman for Golf Course Road and Quarelli Street paving and improvements                        $ 2,583,500 13. Distribution to the San Carlos Apache Tribe for BIA Route 170 sidewalk improvements                                   $ 54,800 14. Distribution to the city of Prescott for construction of and improvements to on-ramps at the interchange of State Route 89A and State Route 89                         $ 4,500,000 15. Distribution to the city of Prescott for State Route 89 improvements between Phippen Trail roundabout and Willow Lake Road roundabout                           $ 4,908,800 16. Distribution to the town of Chino Valley for the development of the design concept report for State Route 89 widening project between Road 5 North and Road 3 North          $ 400,000 17. Distribution to the town of Chino Valley for State Route 89 widening project between Road 5 North and Road 3 North          $ 38,100,000 18. Distribution to the city of Lake Havasu City for city intersection improvement study        $ 250,000 19. Distribution to the city of Lake Havasu City for Kiowa Boulevard improvements between Anacapa Drive and Canyon Cove Drive            $ 5,600,000 20. Distribution to the city of Lake Havasu City for State Route 95 Multi-Use Trail improvements                                   $ 1,880,000 21. Distribution to the city of Lake Havasu City for pavement preservation projects             $ 9,338,800 22. Distribution to the city of Apache Junction for Meridian Road widening and improvements between State Route 24 and Ray Road            $ 11,150,000 23. Distribution to the town of Florence for design concept review of proposed improvements to Hunt Highway between Felix Road and State Route 79                  $ 2,000,000 24. Distribution to the town of Florence for Hunt Highway and Attaway Road intersection improvements                      $ 5,837,300 25. Distribution to the Gila River Indian Community for Koli Road improvements           $ 3,063,500 26. Distribution to the city of Maricopa for Sonoran Desert Parkway design between Porter Road and Interstate 10                  $ 17,007,300 27. Distribution to Pinal county for State Route 24 extension construction between Ironwood Road and proposed North-South freeway corridor                   $ 41,384,400 28. Distribution to the town of Queen Creek for Ironwood Road widening and improvements between Era Mae Boulevard and 1,250 feet south of Ocotillo Road                         $ 2,729,700 29. Distribution to the city of Flagstaff for West Route 66 improvements                     $ 18,649,600 30. Distribution to the city of Flagstaff for U.S. Route 180 Corridor improvements           $ 8,000,000 31. Distribution to the northern Arizona council of governments for rural school bus routes study                               $ 2,880,000 32. Distribution to the city of Sedona for State Route 89A, Forest Road and Ranger Road construction and improvement projects                                       $ 8,025,600 33. Distribution to the town of Eagar for electric vehicle charging station development and construction on North Main Street                              $ 524,300 34. Distribution to the town of Clarkdale for Luke Lane paving and Broadway Street pedestrian safety improvement projects         $ 8,256,600 35. Distribution to the city of Williams for Rodeo Road improvements and pedestrian trail connector projects                       $ 4,259,100 36. Distribution to Yavapai county for Beaver Creek Road paving project development between Montezuma Well and Ranger Road                                $ 1,433,500 37. Distribution to Apache county for the rural school bus route enhancement and soil stabilization project                 $ 665,500 38. Distribution to Apache county for Concho-Snowflake Highway pavement rehabilitation between U.S. 180A and mile post 7.5                              $ 7,390,400 39. Distribution to the town of Camp Verde for Montezuma Castle Highway widening and multimodal improvements                    $ 7,700,000 40. Distribution to the city of Page for North Lake Powell Boulevard roadway and utility improvements between Vista Avenue and South Navajo Drive            $ 8,660,000 41. Distribution to the Navajo Nation for for N9205 low water crossing project at Pueblo Colorado wash                        $ 1,817,000 42. Distribution to the town of Eagar for South Main Street improvements between State Route 260 and West School Bus Road                                           $ 3,150,000 43. Distribution to the Hopi Tribe for Kachina Point Road reconstruction and improvements between State Route 99 and State Route 264                            $ 17,719,000 44. Distribution to the city of Show Low for East Woolford Road extension and construction between State Route 260 and South Penrod Road                          $ 6,500,000 45. Distribution to the city of Winslow for Lindbergh Parkway construction and improvements between Interstate 40 and State Route 87                             $ 2,096,000 46. Distribution to Cochise county for Moson Road improvements between State Route 90 and Hereford Road                              $ 11,400,000 47. Distribution to the city of Sierra Vista for Buffalo Soldier Trail reconstruction and improvements                               $ 8,270,000 48. Distribution to the town of Huachuca City for School Drive improvements                  $ 700,400 49. Distribution to the town of Huachuca City for Gila Street improvements                   $ 1,800,000 50. Distribution to Graham county for 8th Street improvements between Arena Way and 1st Avenue                       $ 2,390,500 51. Distribution to the San Carlos Apache Tribe for Peridot Siding Road pavement rehabilitation between BIA Route 170 and U.S. Route 70                              $ 2,963,800 52. Distribution to the city of Douglas for State Route 80 and Washington Avenue intersection turn lane improvements            $ 1,250,000 53. Distribution to the city of Douglas for downtown revitalization streetscape project                                        $ 7,077,500 54. Distribution to Cochise county for Davis Road improvements between Central Highway and U.S. Route 191                     $ 7,083,400 55. Distribution to Cochise county for culvert construction and improvements at mile posts 5 and 13                         $ 5,617,000 56. Distribution to the town of Duncan for improvements between U.S. Route 70 and Stadium Street                                 $ 1,850,700 57. Distribution to Graham county for Reay Lane improvements between U.S. Route 70 and Safford Bryce Road                $ 3,730,000 58. Distribution to Santa Cruz county for roundabout construction and improvements at the West Frontage Road and Camino Ramanote intersection                          $ 1,103,300 59. Distribution to the city of Nogales for Western Avenue and Target Range Road pavement rehabilitation                        $ 6,532,700 60. Distribution to the city of Casa Grande for freight corridor improvements at the Trekell Road and Jimmie Kerr Boulevard intersection                                   $ 8,824,800 61. Distribution to the city of Coolidge for Proctor and Gamble Roadway improvements                                   $ 16,570,000 62. Distribution to the city of Eloy for Houser Road improvements between the Inland Port of Arizona and Interstate 10                                  $ 8,285,000 63. Distribution to La Paz county for Vicksburg Road improvements between Interstate 10 and State Route 72               $ 11,364,000 64. Distribution to Mohave county for Bank Street improvements between Grace Neal Parkway and Calle Castano Road                 $ 1,575,000 65. Distribution to the town of Colorado City for Mohave Avenue and Redwood Street reconstruction and improvements                $ 1,008,000 66. Distribution to Mohave county for Rancho Sante Fe Parkway lane additions and improvements between the southerly city of Kingman city limits and Hualapai Mountain Road                                  $ 9,000,000 67. Distribution to the city of Kingman for Flying Fortress Parkway design and construction between Berry Road and Kingman Industrial Park                        $ 7,384,300 68. Distribution for Gila River bridge replacement and expansion on U.S. Route 95                                       $ 38,756,000 69. Distribution to Yuma county for U.S. Route 95 improvements between County 17th Street and Avenue D                $ 8,340,000 70. Distribution to the city of Somerton for Main Street improvements at and in the vicinity of the Somerton Avenue intersection                                   $ 1,652,800 71. Distribution to the city of Yuma for 40th Street and State Route 195 intersection improvements                      $ 6,000,000 72. Distribution to the city of Yuma for traffic signal upgrades                        $ 3,000,000